District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

24-271

Establishment of Fund

Repealed.

Oct. 3, 1964, 78 Stat. 1000, Pub. L. 88-622, § 1
May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 17(a), 43 DCR 1179

History

1981 Ed., §§ 24-451 to 24-455.
1973 Ed., §§ 24-451 to 24-455.

Prior Codifications